Louisiana, session 2026, SB373.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:824(B)(1)(a) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 15:828.5
is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§824. Commitment of persons to the Department of Public Safety and Corrections
* * *
B.(1)(a)(i) In the event any individual has been committed to the department
for confinement which is or has been delayed or prevented after final sentence by
court order restricting the department from institutionalizing the individual, or when
Page 1 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-628 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 373
the individual is not institutionalized in a state penal or corrections institution
because of lack of facilities under the control of the department, or the department
otherwise refused to accept the individual for confinement, which resulted or has
resulted in the individual being confined in a parish jail or institution after final
sentence, or when he is being held in the parish jail without bail, pending an appeal,
or when he is a participant in a Blue Walters Substance Abuse Program by order of
a court in lieu of revocation of probation or by the committee on parole in lieu of
revocation of parole, the department shall pay to each parish sheriff, or to the
governing authority of those parishes in which the governing authority operates the
parish jail, for keeping and feeding the individual in the parish jail the sum of
twenty-five dollars and thirty-nine cents per day for Fiscal Year 2019-2020, the sum
of twenty-six dollars and thirty-nine cents per day for Fiscal Year 2020-2021, and
each fiscal year thereafter. Such daily sum shall be paid from date of sentencing until
the individual is confined in a penal or correctional institution under the supervision
of the department. The department shall work with sheriffs, or the governing
authority of those parishes in which the governing authority operates the parish jail,
to ensure that the basic jail guidelines are amended by December 31, 2020, to
specifically provide for treatment and educational programming for individuals
confined in a parish jail or institution.
(ii) Any subsequent increases in the daily sum provided for in Item (i) of
this Subparagraph on or after January 1, 2026, shall be contingent upon
compliance with basic jail guidelines approved by the department, all applicable
safety and sanitation laws and regulations, and criteria established by the
department by rule. The department shall adopt rules and regulations, in
consultation with the sheriff or the governing authority that operates the parish
jail, for the implementation of the provisions of this Item. The rules shall
establish criteria for eligibility to receive additional per diem funding , including
benchmarks and reporting requirements. Such criteria shall include but not be
limited to requirements designed to:
Page 2 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-628 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 373
(aa) Mitigate the state's exposure to liability risks such as addressing
critical facility upgrades and repairs.
(bb) Ensure safe, sanitary, and code-compliant conditions.
(cc) Provide and upgrade adequate technology infrastructure, if
applicable.
* * *
§828.5. Transitional Workforce and Vocational Training Pilot Program;
establishment
A. The "Transitional Workforce and Vocational Training Pilot
Program" is hereby created and established within the Department of Public
Safety and Corrections.
B. Not later than January 1, 2027, the Department of Public Safety and
Corrections shall implement the pilot program for inmates sentenced to the
department who are in custody of the sheriff or the governing authority that
operates the parish jail. The program shall provide workforce and vocational
training to inmates in high-demand skilled trades to address critical workforce
gaps and industry shortages while strengthening reentry outcomes.
C. The secretary of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections
shall select the location and number of inmates in the pilot program.
D. The provisions of this Section shall be implemented only to the extent
that funds are appropriated for this purpose.
E. No later than January 1, 2029, the secretary shall submit a report on
the overall success of the pilot program to the Joint Legislative Committee on
the Budget, the Senate Committee on Judiciary B, and the House Committee on
Administration of Criminal Justice. The report shall include a recommendation
that the program be continued, expanded, or terminated.
F. The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, in consultation
with the sheriff or the governing authority that operates the parish jail, shall
adopt rules and regulations, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure
Page 3 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-628 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 373
Act, to implement the provisions of this Section.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.